West Virginia, session 2026, SB227.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 17. non-profit transparency and accountability act. §31E-17-1701. Title. This article shall be called "Non-Profit Transparency and Accountability Act." §31E-17-1702. Legislative Findings. (a) The Legislature finds that:(1) The spirit of a nonprofit or not-for-profit in West Virginia is rooted in public charity and benevolence;(2) The presumption of the public toward a nonprofit or not-for-profit is of social or civic needs which are otherwise unaddressed;(3) The effectiveness of a nonprofit or not-for-profit organization depends upon broad public confidence in the management of such non-profits;(4) Public moneys from federal or state sources are necessarily subject to oversight, transparency, and proof of stewardship;(b) The Legislature finds that individuals and groups wishing to engage in entrepreneurial and enterprising activities have a wide range of filing statuses from which to choose. §31E-17-1703. Nonprofit Freedom of Information Act requirements. (a) Nonprofit and not-for-profit entities operating in the state of West Virginia, which receive any part of their total operating funds from direct public sources, whether through state or federal appropriations, shall be subject to Freedom of Information Act requests and shall bear the responsibility to respond under the same requirements as a public body.(b) Nonprofit and not-for-profit entities, operating in the State of West Virginia, receiving public funds shall enroll in Open Checkbooks.